Utah statutes.
20A-7-512.   Misconduct of electors and officers -- Penalty.

(1)  It is unlawful for any person to:

(a)  sign any name other than his own to any initiative petition;

(b)  knowingly sign his name more than once for the same measure at one election;

(c)  sign an initiative knowing he is not a legal voter; or

(d)  knowingly and willfully violate any provision of this part.

(2)  It is unlawful for any person to sign the verification for an initiative packet knowing that:

(a)  he does not meet the residency requirements of Section 20A-2-105;

(b)  he has not witnessed the signatures of those persons whose names appear in the initiative packet; or

(c)  one or more persons whose signatures appear in the initiative packet is either:

(i)  not registered to vote in Utah; or

(ii)  does not intend to become registered to vote in Utah.

(3)  Any person violating this part is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(4)  The county attorney or municipal attorney shall prosecute any violation of this section.

